Wyoming, session 2025, HB0090.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 11-18-103(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xiii) is amended to read:
11-18-103. Livestock board; powers generally.
(a) In addition to powers and duties hereinafter
provided, the Wyoming livestock board shall:
(xiii) Establish a standard notification
protocol to inform livestock producers, veterinarians,
brand inspectors and other agencies with jurisdiction or
authority regarding anthrax outbreaks.
Section 2. The livestock board shall report to the
joint agriculture, state and public lands and water
resources interim committee not later than September 30,
2025 regarding the status of the standard notification
protocol required by section 1 of this section. The report
shall include suggestions for legislation that may be
necessary to implement the protocol.
Section 3. The livestock board shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement the provisions of this act.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0090
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2